California, session 20252026, AB1072.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 13600) is added to Division 13 of the Elections Code, to read: CHAPTER 7. Ballot Mistakes13600. The Secretary of State, in consultation with county elections officials, shall develop uniform standards and guidelines for a voter to correct mistakes made on the voter’s ballot. The Secretary of State may adopt appropriate regulations for the purpose of ensuring uniform application of the standards and guidelines.